Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62A.68] DIRECT PRIMARY CARE AGREEMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Not insurance. new text end new text begin A direct primary care agreement does not constitute a health plan, a policy or certificate of accident and sickness insurance, a subscriber contract or service plan regulated by chapter 62C, a health maintenance contract or certificate regulated by chapter 62D, a health benefit certificate regulated by chapter 64B, or health coverage regulated by chapter 62H or 62N. Direct primary care agreements and primary care providers who are a party to a direct primary care agreement are, with respect to a direct primary care agreement, exempt from regulation under chapters 60A to 72A. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "direct primary care agreement" means a written agreement that: new text end new text begin (1) is between a patient or the patient's legal representative and a primary care provider; new text end new text begin (2) allows either party to terminate the agreement in writing, without a penalty or termination fee payment, at any time or after notice of not more than 60 days as specified in the agreement; new text end new text begin (3) describes the health care services to be provided in exchange for the patient paying a periodic fee to the primary care provider; new text end new text begin (4) specifies the required periodic fee and any additional fees that may be charged; new text end new text begin (5) permits a third party to pay the periodic fee and any additional fees; new text end new text begin (6) prohibits the primary care provider from charging or receiving additional compensation for health care services included in the periodic fee; and new text end new text begin (7) conspicuously and prominently states that the direct primary care agreement does not constitute health insurance. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for agreements issued, offered, or renewed on or after July 1, 2025. new text end